California, session 20252026, SB310.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 210 of the Labor Code is amended to read:210. (a) In addition to, and entirely independent and apart from, any other penalty provided in this article, every person who fails to pay the wages of each employee as provided in Sections 201.3, 204, 204b, 204.1, 204.2, 204.11, 205, 205.5, and 1197.5, shall be subject to a penalty as follows:(1) For any initial violation, one hundred dollars ($100) for each failure to pay each employee.(2) For each subsequent violation, or any willful or intentional violation, two hundred dollars ($200) for each failure to pay each employee, plus 25 percent of the amount unlawfully withheld.(b) The penalty shall may either be recovered by the employee as a statutory penalty pursuant to Section 98 or through an independent civil action, or by the Labor Commissioner as a civil penalty through the issuance of a citation or pursuant to Section 98.3. The procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations issued by the Labor Commissioner under this section shall be the same as those set forth in subdivisions (b) through to (k), inclusive, of Section 1197.1. (c) The penalty provided under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may be recovered by the employee as a statutory penalty through an independent civil action.(c)(d) An employee is only entitled to either recover the statutory penalty provided for in this section, pursuant to Section 98 or through an independent civil action, or to enforce a civil penalty as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 2699, but not both, for the same violation.(d)(e) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.